Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-117.01
Low-income individual, defined.

Low-income individual means an individual enrolled in a state or federal public assistance program, including, but not limited to, the medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act, the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, or the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, or whose household adjusted gross income is below one hundred thirty percent of the federal income poverty guideline or a higher threshold to be set by the Licensure Unit of the Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2019, LB112, § 3.

Medical Assistance Act, see section 68-901.